Louisiana, session 2026, HB1017.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2801(A)(4)(g) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2801. Partition of community property and settlement of claims arising from
matrimonial regimes and co-ownership of former community property
A. When the spouses are unable to agree on a partition of community
property or on the settlement of the claims between the spouses arising either from
the matrimonial regime, or from the co-ownership of former community property
following termination of the matrimonial regime, either spouse, as an incident of the
action that would result in a termination of the matrimonial regime or upon
termination of the matrimonial regime or thereafter, may institute a proceeding,
which shall be conducted in accordance with the following rules:
* * *
(4) The court shall then partition the community in accordance with the
following rules:
* * *
(g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any increase in a
full-time firefighter's earnable compensation that occurs following termination of a
community of acquets and gains and that was conditioned on the firefighter's passage
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1017 ENROLLED
of both a written examination and a working test shall not be included in the
calculation of a former spouse's portion of community property.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.